Tennessee, session 114, HB0578.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1324, is amended by deleting
subdivision (i)(1) and substituting:
(1) "Dangerous felony" means:
(A) First degree murder, as defined in § 39-13-202;
(B) Second degree murder, as defined in § 39-13-210;
(C) Voluntary manslaughter, as defined in § 39-13-211;
(D) Criminally negligent homicide, as defined in § 39-13-212;
(E) Reckless homicide, as defined in § 39-13-215;
(F) Aggravated kidnapping, as defined in § 39-13-304;
(G) Especially aggravated kidnapping, as defined in § 39-13-305;
(H) Involuntary labor servitude, as defined in § 39-13-307;
(I) Trafficking for forced labor or services, as defined in § 39-13-308;
(J) Trafficking for commercial sex acts, as defined in § 39-13-309;
(K) Aggravated human trafficking, as defined in § 39-13-316;
(L) Robbery, as defined in § 39-13-401;
(M) Aggravated robbery, as defined in § 39-13-402;
(N) Especially aggravated robbery, as defined in § 39-13-403;
(O) Carjacking, as defined in § 39-13-404;
(P) Aggravated rape, as defined in § 39-13-502;
HB0578
000400
- 1 -

(Q) Rape, as defined in § 39-13-503;
(R) Aggravated sexual battery, as defined in § 39-13-504;
(S) Rape of a child, as defined in § 39-13-522;
(T) Sexual battery by an authority figure, as defined in § 39-13-527;
(U) Aggravated rape of a child, as defined in § 39-13-531;
(V) Especially aggravated rape, as defined in § 39-13-534;
(W) Especially aggravated rape of a child, as defined in § 39-13-535;
(X) Aggravated burglary, as defined in § 39-13-1003;
(Y) Especially aggravated burglary, as defined in § 39-13-1004;
(Z) Aggravated stalking, as defined in § 39-17-315(c);
(AA) Especially aggravated stalking, as defined in § 39-17-315(d);
(BB) Initiating the process intended to manufacture methamphetamine,
as defined in § 39-17-435;
(CC) A felony involving the sale, manufacture, distribution, or possession
with intent to sell, manufacture, or distribute a controlled substance or controlled
substance analogue, as defined in part 4 of this chapter; or
(DD) Any attempt, as defined in § 39-12-101, to commit a dangerous
felony;
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1324, is amended by
designating subsection (d) as subdivision (d)(1) and adding the following subdivision (d)(2):
(2) A lesser included offense of the predicate dangerous felony named in
the indictment or presentment is included in the indictment or presentment by
implication if the lesser included offense is a dangerous felony, as defined in
subdivision (i)(1).
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 000400